Florida, session 2026, SB964.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (6) of section 26 112.3148, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 27 112.3148âReporting and prohibited receipt of gifts by 28 individuals filing full or limited public disclosure of 29 financial interests and by procurement employees.â 30 (6) 31 (d)âNo later than July 1 of each year, each reporting 32 individual or procurement employee shall file a statement 33 listing each gift having a value in excess of $100 received by 34 the reporting individual or procurement employee, either 35 directly or indirectly, from a governmental entity or a direct 36 support organization specifically authorized by law to support a 37 governmental entity. The statement shall list the name of the 38 person providing the gift, a description of the gift, the date 39 or dates on which the gift was given, and the value of the total 40 gifts given during the calendar year for which the report is 41 made. The reporting individual or procurement employee shall 42 attach to the statement any report received by him or her in 43 accordance with paragraph (c), which report shall become a 44 public record when filed with the statement of the reporting 45 individual or procurement employee. The reporting individual or 46 procurement employee may explain any differences between the 47 report of the reporting individual or procurement employee and 48 the attached reports. The annual report filed by a reporting 49 individual shall be filed with the financial disclosure 50 statement required by either s. 8, Art. II of the State 51 Constitution or s. 112.3145, as applicable to the reporting 52 individual. The annual report filed by a procurement employee 53 shall be filed with the Commission on Ethics. The report filed 54 by a reporting individual or procurement employee who left 55 office or employment during the calendar year covered by the 56 report shall be filed with the Commission on Ethics by July 1 of 57 the year after leaving office or employment at the same location 58 as his or her final financial disclosure statement or, in the 59 case of a former procurement employee, with the Commission on 60 Ethics. 61 Section 2.âSubsection (6) of section 112.3149, Florida 62 Statutes, is amended to read: 63 112.3149âSolicitation and disclosure of honoraria.â 64 (6)âA reporting individual or procurement employee who 65 receives payment or provision of expenses related to any 66 honorarium event from a person who is prohibited by subsection 67 (4) from paying an honorarium to a reporting individual or 68 procurement employee shall publicly disclose on an annual 69 statement the name, address, and affiliation of the person 70 paying or providing the expenses; the amount of the honorarium 71 expenses; the date of the honorarium event; a description of the 72 expenses paid or provided on each day of the honorarium event; 73 and the total value of the expenses provided to the reporting 74 individual or procurement employee in connection with the 75 honorarium event. The annual statement of honorarium expenses 76 shall be filed by July 1 of each year for those expenses 77 received during the previous calendar year. The reporting 78 individual or procurement employee shall attach to the annual 79 statement a copy of each statement received by him or her in 80 accordance with subsection (5) regarding honorarium expenses 81 paid or provided during the calendar year for which the annual 82 statement is filed. The attached statement shall become a public 83 record upon the filing of the annual report. The annual 84 statement of a reporting individual shall be filed with the 85 financial disclosure statement required by either s. 8, Art. II 86 of the State Constitution or s. 112.3145, as applicable to the 87 reporting individual. The annual statement of a procurement 88 employee shall be filed with the Commission on Ethics. The 89 statement filed by a reporting individual or procurement 90 employee who left office or employment during the calendar year 91 covered by the statement shall be filed with the Commission on 92 Ethics by July 1 of the year after leaving office or employment 93 at the same location as his or her final financial disclosure 94 statement or, in the case of a former procurement employee, with 95 the Commission on Ethics. 96 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.